Hawaii statutes.
§489D-14.5 Name change. To change its
name, its fictitious name, or its trade name, a licensee shall file an
application with the commissioner and pay a nonrefundable fee of $1,000 or a
greater amount as the commissioner shall establish by rule pursuant to chapter
91. The application shall be approved if the commissioner is satisfied that
the new name complies with all applicable laws. Any change of name shall not
affect a licensee's rights, liabilities, or obligations existing prior to the
effective date thereof, and no documents of transfer shall be necessary to
preserve such rights, liabilities, or obligations; provided that the
commissioner may require notice to be given to the public and other
governmental agencies. [L 2008, c 195, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 167, §9]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next